Utah statutes.
77-41-106.   Registerable offenses.

Offenses referred to in Subsection 77-41-105(3)(c)(i) are:

(1)  any offense listed in Subsection 77-41-102(9) or (16) if, at the time of the conviction, the offender has previously been convicted of an offense listed in Subsection 77-41-102(9) or (16) or has previously been required to register as a sex offender for an offense committed as a juvenile;

(2)  a conviction for any of the following offenses, including attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit any felony of:

(a)  Section 76-5-301.1, child kidnapping, except if the offender is a natural parent of the victim;

(b)  Section 76-5-402, rape;

(c)  Section 76-5-402.1, rape of a child;

(d)  Section 76-5-402.2, object rape;

(e)  Section 76-5-402.3, object rape of a child;

(f)  Section 76-5-403.1, sodomy on a child;

(g)  Subsection 76-5-404.1(4), aggravated sexual abuse of a child; or

(h)  Section 76-5-405, aggravated sexual assault;

(3)  Section 76-4-401, a felony violation of enticing a minor over the Internet;

(4)  Section 76-5-302, aggravated kidnapping, except if the offender is a natural parent of the victim;

(5)  Section 76-5-403, forcible sodomy;

(6)  Section 76-5-404.1, sexual abuse of a child;

(7)  Section 76-5b-201, sexual exploitation of a minor; or

(8)  Section 76-10-1306, aggravated exploitation of prostitution, on or after May 10, 2011.

